Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-407
Rules and regulations.

(1) The Secretary of State shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations:

(a) Creating standards for online notarial acts in accordance with the Online Notary Public Act, including standards for credential analysis, identity proofing, and communication technology used for online notarial acts; and

(b) To ensure the integrity, security, and authenticity of online notarial acts in accordance with the Online Notary Public Act. Such rules and regulations shall include procedures for the approval of online notary solution providers by the Secretary of State.

(2) The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the utilization of online notarial acts.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 7.